Massachusetts, session 194th, H4590.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a task force created to develop a statutory and regulatory
framework to identify, monitor, and remediate indoor air pollution and indoor mold
contamination in schools, long-term care facilities, correctional facilities, early childhood
education facilities, public housing, and privately-owned residential buildings. The task force
shall also identify and make recommendations for funding sources for implementation of its
recommendations.
(b) Said task force shall be comprised of the commissioner of public health or a designee,
who shall serve as chair, the commissioner of environmental protection or a designee; the
secretary of housing and livable communities or a designee; the attorney general or a designee;
and 11 additional members to be appointed by the Governor: a representative of a community-
based environmental justice organization; an academic expert on environmental health; a
representative of the Massachusetts Association of Health Boards; a labor representative
recommended by the President of the Massachusetts AFL-CIO; an individual with experience in
community clinical health care; an individual with experience in the state’s shelter housing
of 3

system; an individual with experience in long-term senior care; an individual with experience in
identifying and monitoring indoor air pollution and indoor mold contamination; an individual
with experience in remediating indoor air pollution and indoor mold contamination; an
individual with experience monitoring environmental health in correctional facilities; and an
individual with experience in public school administration.
(c) The task force shall convene its first meeting within 30 days of the passage of this
Act. Said task force shall submit a final report with its recommendations to the clerks of the
house of representatives and the senate, the house and senate committees on ways and means, the
joint committee on public health, the executive office of health and human services, the
executive office of energy and environmental affairs, the Attorney General, and the state
Environmental Justice Council within one year of the passage of this Act. Not less than 30 days
prior to the release of said final report, the task force shall release draft recommendations for
public review and comment.
SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
department of public health, in consultation with the department of environmental protection,
shall promulgate regulations for conducting indoor air quality assessments monitoring exposure
to ultrafine particulate matter and black carbon particulate matter concentrations present in the
indoor air of existing and proposed buildings, based on the best available science about the
health risks associated with ultrafine particulate matter and black carbon. The regulations shall
include, but not be limited to, establishing standard procedures and public reporting mechanisms
for conducting air dispersion modeling, managing air pollution, monitoring ultrafine particulate
matter, and estimating exposure.
of 3

SECTION 3. The department of public health shall promulgate regulations relative to
conducting indoor air quality assessments no later than July 31, 2027.
of 3